Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 4. Consumer Advocate

Postponed legislation. —

Pursuant to its own terms, this article is repealed effective July 1, 2023. See
§
37-2-404(b).

§ 37-2-401.
Office of consumer advocate created; purpose.

The office of consumer advocate is created as a separate division within the public service commission. The office of consumer advocate shall represent the interests of Wyoming citizens and all classes of utility customers in matters involving public utilities. In the exercise of its powers the office of the consumer advocate shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the provision of safe, efficient and reliable utility services at just and reasonable prices.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 172, § 1.

§ 37-2-402.
Consumer advocate; powers and duties.

The consumer advocate shall have the power to:

Act as a party in any proceeding before the commission, with the same rights and subject to the same obligations and requirements and limitations on ex parte communications, including confidentiality requirements, as other parties to the proceeding;

Appeal actions of the commission in accordance with W.S.

37-2-219

;

Seek permission to appear as amicus curiae in any court proceeding in order to accomplish the purposes specified in this article;

Provide information and assistance to individual consumers regarding proceedings within the jurisdiction of the commission.

In any commission docketed case initiated by the regulated company in which the consumer advocate is a party, the consumer advocate shall have the same access to books, maps, contracts, reports and records of every description as the commission. For all other instances, the consumer advocate shall have the same access as other parties.

The consumer advocate shall not advocate for or on behalf of any individual, organization or entity.

The consumer advocate may enter into stipulations with other parties in any proceeding to balance the interests of those it represents with the interests of the public utilities as means of minimizing the weaknesses of the adversarial process, improving the quality of resulting decisions in a highly technical environment and minimizing the cost of regulation.

In any case where the office of consumer advocate does not intervene, the commission shall have the authority to authorize its staff to participate as a party before the commission. The commission shall exercise this authority not later than five (5) business days following the deadline for any intervention.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 172, § 1; 2013 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (e).

§ 37-2-403.
Consumer advocate; administrator and staff.

The administrative head of the division shall be an administrator appointed by the governor with senate confirmation. The administrator shall employ and supervise personnel as authorized by legislative appropriation. Except as provided in W.S.

37-2-404

the employees of the office of consumer advocate shall not be supervised or directed by the commission.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 172, § 1; 2013 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2003, ch. 172, § 3, authorizes 6 full-time positions for the office of the consumer advocate: the administrator, 2 rate analysts and 1 attorney from personnel currently employed by the commission, and 2 additional full-time positions. The commission is to make a one- time designation of which existing positions may become full-time consumer advocate positions, and thereafter personnel within the office of consumer advocate are to be employed and supervised as provided by W.S.

37-2-403

. Nothing in the act is deemed to affect the employment rights of current permanent employees transferred to the office of consumer advocate pursuant to the act.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “with senate confirmation” for “not later than July 1, 2003”.

§ 37-2-404.
Consumer advocate; funding and expenses.

Funding for the office of consumer advocate shall be included in the commission’s budget and collected through the utility assessment. Incidental administrative and clerical services for the office of consumer advocate shall be provided by the commission. The commission shall decide all matters of shared administrative and clerical personnel.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 62, § 1.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 172, § 1; 2007, ch. 123, § 1; 2013 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, extended the former repeal date of “July 1, 2009” to “July 1, 2013.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “2023” for “2013” in (b).

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, deleted "uniform" preceding "utility" in the first sentence of (a).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (b), which read, "his article is repealed effective July 1, 2023."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.